Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 5. Home Solicitation Sales

§ 40-14-251.
Definition.

“Home solicitation sale” means a consumer credit sale of goods or services with a purchase price of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or more written under single or multiple contracts, in which the seller or a person acting for him engages in a personal solicitation of the sale including face-to-face confrontation or telephone solicitation, at a place other than the place of business of the seller and the buyer’s agreement or offer to purchase is there given to the seller or a person acting for him.

“Home solicitation sale” shall not include:

A sale consummated entirely by telephone or mail if initiated by the buyer;

A sale made pursuant to a preexisting revolving charge account; or

A sale made pursuant to prior negotiations between the parties at a business establishment with a fixed location where goods or services are offered or exhibited for sale.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-501; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-501; Laws 1979, ch. 117, § 1; 1981, ch. 147, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to home solicitation sales under Wyoming Consumer Protection Act, see §

40-12-104

.

§ 40-14-252.
Buyer's right to cancel.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, in addition to any right otherwise to revoke an offer, the buyer has the right to cancel a home solicitation sale until midnight of the third business day after the day on which the buyer signs an agreement or offer to purchase which complies with this part.

Cancellation occurs when the buyer gives written notice of cancellation to the seller at the address stated in the agreement or offer to purchase.

Notice of cancellation, if given by mail, is given when it is deposited in a mailbox properly addressed and postage prepaid.

Notice of cancellation given by the buyer need not take a particular form and is sufficient if it indicates by any form of written expression the intention of the buyer not to be bound by the home solicitation sale.

The buyer may not cancel a home solicitation sale if the buyer requests the seller to provide goods or services without delay because of an emergency, and:

The seller in good faith makes a substantial beginning of performance of the contract before the buyer gives notice of cancellation; and

In the case of goods, the goods cannot be returned to the seller in substantially as good condition as when received by the buyer.

If a home solicitation sale is also subject to any other provisions on a debtor’s right to rescind certain transactions, the buyer may proceed either under those provisions or under this part.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-502; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-502; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (f), substituted "any other" for "the" following "subject to", added "a" preceding "debtor's" and deleted "(W.S.

40-14-523

)" preceding "the buyer."

§ 40-14-253.
Form of agreement or offer; statement of buyer's rights; form of notice of cancellation; compliance by seller.

In a home solicitation sale, unless the buyer requests the seller to provide goods or services without delay in an emergency, the seller shall:

Present to the buyer and obtain his signature to a written agreement or offer to purchase which:

Is in the same language as that principally used in the oral sales presentation;

Designates the date on which the buyer actually signs as the date of the transaction;

Contains the name and address of the seller; and

In immediate proximity to the space reserved for the buyer’s signature, contains a statement of the buyer’s rights which substantially complies with subsection (b) of this section.

Provide a notice of cancellation form which substantially complies with subsection (c) of this section.

The statement of the buyer’s rights shall:

Appear under the conspicuous caption “Buyer’s right to cancel”;

Be printed in boldface type of a minimum size of ten (10) points; and

Read as follows: “You, the buyer, may cancel this transaction at any time prior to 12:00 midnight of the third business day after the date of this transaction. See the attached notice of cancellation form for an explanation of this right.”.

The notice of cancellation form shall:

Be completed in duplicate;

Appear under the conspicuous caption “Notice of cancellation”;

Be printed in boldface type of a minimum size of ten (10) points;

Be printed in the same language used in the written agreement or offer to purchase;

Be attached to the written agreement or offer to purchase and be easily detachable; and

Read as follows:

“You may cancel this transaction without any penalty or obligation within three (3) business days from (enter date of transaction). If you cancel, any property traded in, any payments made by you under the contract or sale and any negotiable instrument executed by you will be returned within ten (10) business days following receipt by the seller of your cancellation notice. Any security interest arising out of the transaction will be cancelled. If you cancel, you must make available to the seller at your residence, in substantially as good condition as when received, any goods delivered to you under this contract or sale, or you may if you wish comply with the instructions of the seller regarding the return shipment of the goods at the seller's expense and risk. If you do make the goods available to the seller and the seller does not pick them up within twenty (20) days of the date of your notice of cancellation, you may retain or dispose of the goods without any further obligation. If you fail to make the goods available to the seller, or if you agree to return the goods to the seller and fail to do so, then you remain liable for performance of all obligations under the contract. To cancel this transaction, mail or deliver a signed and dated copy of this cancellation notice or any other written notice, or send a telegram, to (name of seller), at (address of seller's place of business) not later than 12:00 midnight of (date). I hereby cancel this transaction. (Date) (Buyer's signature)”

Click to view

Until the seller has complied with this section, the buyer may cancel the home solicitation sale by notifying the seller of his intention to cancel.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-503; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-503; Laws 1979, ch. 117, § 1.

§ 40-14-254.
Restoration of down payment; retention of goods by buyer.

Within ten (10) days after a home solicitation sale has been cancelled or an offer to purchase revoked, the seller shall tender to the buyer any goods traded in, any payments made by the buyer and any note or other evidence of indebtedness.

If the down payment includes goods traded in, the goods must be tendered in substantially as good condition as when received by the seller. If the seller fails to tender the goods as provided by this section, the buyer may elect to recover an amount equal to the trade-in allowance stated in the agreement.

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 117, § 2.

Until the seller has complied with the obligations imposed by this section the buyer may retain possession of goods delivered to him by the seller and has a lien on the goods in his possession or control for any recovery to which he is entitled.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-504; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-504; Laws 1979, ch. 117, §§ 1, 2.

§ 40-14-255.
Duty of buyer; no compensation for services prior to cancellation; noncompliance by buyer.

Except retention of goods by the buyer pursuant to W.S. 40-14-254(d), within a reasonable time after a home solicitation sale has been cancelled or an offer to purchase revoked, the buyer upon demand shall tender to the seller any goods delivered by the seller pursuant to the sale. The buyer is not obligated to tender at any place other than his residence. If the seller fails to demand possession of goods within a reasonable time after cancellation or revocation, the goods become the property of the buyer without obligation to pay. For the purpose of this section, twenty (20) days is presumed to be a reasonable time.

The buyer has a duty to take reasonable care of the goods in his possession before cancellation or revocation and for a reasonable time thereafter, during which time the goods are otherwise at the seller’s risk.

If the seller has performed any services pursuant to a home solicitation sale prior to its cancellation, the seller is entitled to no compensation.

If the buyer fails to comply with this section or agrees to return any goods to the seller at the seller’s expense and risk and fails to do so, the buyer remains liable for performance of all obligations under the written agreement or offer to purchase.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-505; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-505; Laws 1979, ch. 117, § 1.